Utah statutes.
78B-8-401.   Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

(1)  "Blood or contaminated body fluids" includes blood, amniotic fluid, pericardial fluid, peritoneal fluid, pleural fluid, synovial fluid, cerebrospinal fluid, semen, and vaginal secretions, and any body fluid visibly contaminated with blood.

(2)  "Disease" means Human Immunodeficiency Virus infection, acute or chronic Hepatitis B infection, Hepatitis C infection, and any other infectious disease specifically designated by the Labor Commission in consultation with the Department of Health for the purposes of this chapter.

(3)  "Emergency medical services provider" means an individual certified under Section 26-8a-302, a public safety officer, local fire department personnel, or personnel employed by the Department of Corrections or by a county jail, who provide prehospital emergency medical care for an emergency medical services  provider either as an employee or as a volunteer.

(4)  "First aid volunteer" means a person who provides voluntary emergency assistance or first aid medical care to an injured person prior to the arrival of an emergency medical services provider or public safety officer.

(5)  "Public safety officer" means a peace officer as defined in Title 53, Chapter 13, Peace Officer Classifications.

(6)  "Significant exposure" and "significantly exposed" mean:

(a)  exposure of the body of one person to the blood or body fluids of another person by:

(i)  percutaneous injury, including a needle stick or cut with a sharp object or instrument; or

(ii)  contact with an open wound, mucous membrane, or nonintact skin because of a cut, abrasion, dermatitis, or other damage; or

(b)  exposure that occurs by any other method of transmission defined by the Department of Health as a significant exposure.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

